Illinois, session 104th, HB3317.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Collective Bargaining Freedom Act is 5amended by changing Section 15 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 12/15)7    Sec. 15. Private sector union security agreements. 8    (a) Employers and labor organizations covered by the 9National Labor Relations Act may, anywhere within the entire 10State of Illinois, execute and apply agreements requiring 11membership in a labor organization as a condition of 12employment to the full extent authorized by the National Labor 13Relations Act.14    (b) Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, employers 15that are licensed under the Cannabis Regulation and Tax Act or 16the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis Program Act and 17labor organizations may, anywhere within the entire State of 18Illinois, execute and apply agreements requiring membership in 19a labor organization as a condition of employment.20(Source: P.A. 101-3, eff. 4-12-19.)